Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1403
Supplementary principles of law applicable.

Unless displaced by the provisions of the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, the principles of law and equity, including the law relating to capacity to contract, mutuality of obligations, principal and agent, real property, public health, safety and fire prevention, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement the act's provisions.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 2.